Nevada, session 83, AB132.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 533.027 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.027 1. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The use of water in emergency situations to extinguish fires
by a public agency or a volunteer fire department; or
(b) The de minimus collection of precipitation:
(1) From the rooftop of a single-family dwelling for
nonpotable domestic use; or
(2) If the collection does not conflict with any existing water
rights as determined by the State Engineer, in a guzzler to provide
water for use by wildlife. The guzzler must:
(I) Have a capacity of [20,000] 40,000 gallons or less;
(II) Have a capture area of 1 acre or less;
(III) Have a pipe length of [1/4] 1/2 mile or less;
(IV) Be developed by a state or federal agency
responsible for wildlife management or by any other person in
consultation with the Department of Wildlife; and
(V) Be approved for use by the Department of Wildlife.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic use” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 534.013.
(b) “Guzzler” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 501.121.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) “Public agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department or division of this State or a political
subdivision of this State.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)